Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202179-538
Student identification cards; requirements.

Beginning with the 2022-23 school year, each school board shall require that the telephone number for a national suicide prevention hotline, a local suicide prevention hotline, or a crisis text line is printed on each new student identification card issued to a student enrolled in a middle school grade or a high school grade, as defined by such school board, in a school under the authority of such school board. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the issuance of student identification cards to students in any school.

Laws 2021, LB528, § 68.